apertium-la-es.la.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__amans">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tis</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tem</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tium</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tis</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tem</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tium</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tis</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tium</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tibus</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tia</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tia</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tia</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="liber__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__liber"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tot/us__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>us<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="human/us__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>us<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senior"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issim</l>
          <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iu/venis__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ven</l>
          <r>venis<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>venis<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senior"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>veni</l>
          <r>venis<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senior"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>venissim</l>
          <r>venis<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sen/ex__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ex<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senex"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ex<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senior"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issim</l>
          <r>ex<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vet/us__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>us<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__vetus"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senior"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>errim</l>
          <r>us<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="atro/x__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>x<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__atrox"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
          <r>x<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senior"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cissim</l>
          <r>x<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ma/gnus__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gn</l>
          <r>gnus<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>gnus<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__senior"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>xim</l>
          <r>gnus<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prim/us__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>us<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="totus"><i>tot</i><par n="tot/us__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="primus"><i>prim</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="secundus"><i>secund</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tertius"><i>terti</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="quartus"><i>quart</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="quintus"><i>quint</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sextus"><i>sext</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="septimus"><i>septim</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="octavus"><i>octav</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="nonus"><i>non</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="decimus"><i>decim</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="undecimus"><i>undecim</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="duodecimus"><i>duodecim</i><par n="prim/us__det"/></e>
    <e lm="liber"><i>liber</i><par n="liber__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="magnus"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/gnus__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mathematicus"><i>mathematic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adnixus"><i>adnix</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="novus"><i>nov</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="electronicus"><i>electronic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="scientificus"><i>scientific</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Britannicus"><i>Britannic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Romanus"><i>Roman</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="archaeologicus"><i>archaeologic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ammirandus"><i>ammirand</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abdicativus"><i>abdicativ</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abjudicativus"><i>abjudicativ</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abnegativus"><i>abnegativ</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="absolutus"><i>absolut</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="abstractus"><i>abstract</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="absconsus"><i>abscons</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="acatholicus"><i>acatholic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="acusticus"><i>acustic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adaequatus"><i>adaequat</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adaptertus"><i>adaptert</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="addititius"><i>addititi</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adhaesivus"><i>adhaesiv</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adluvius"><i>adluvi</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adtonitus"><i>adtonit</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adventitius"><i>adventiti</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aequidianus"><i>aequidian</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="algidus"><i>algid</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alternatus"><i>alternat</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amphibolus"><i>amphibol</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anatomicus"><i>anatomic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="apologeticus"><i>apologetic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arenosus"><i>arenos</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="astronomicus"><i>astronomic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="attractorius"><i>attractori</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="automaticus"><i>automatic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baburrus"><i>baburr</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bibliographicus"><i>bibliographic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blavus"><i>blav</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="caecatus"><i>caecat</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="causticus"><i>caustic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="centratus"><i>centrat</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="chronologicus"><i>chronologic</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="clinatus"><i>clinat</i><par n="human/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iuvenis"><i>iu</i><par n="iu/venis__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="senex"><i>sen</i><par n="sen/ex__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vetus"><i>vet</i><par n="vet/us__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="atrox"><i>atro</i><par n="atro/x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="celox"><i>celo</i><par n="atro/x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ferox"><i>fero</i><par n="atro/x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="praecox"><i>praeco</i><par n="atro/x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="velox"><i>velo</i><par n="atro/x__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="loquax"><i>loqua</i><par n="atro/x__adj"/></e>
